Georgia, session 2025_26, HB202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
22 SECTION 1.
23 (a) The General Assembly finds that charter schools, including locally authorized charter
24 schools, provide innovative and effective educational opportunities for students in Georgia.
25 (b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
26 (1) Encourage local school systems to serve as local authorizers of charter schools;
27 (2) Provide financial incentives to local school systems that authorize and oversee charter
28 schools; and
29 (3) Ensure accountability for local school systems that consistently deny charter petitions
30 that are subsequently approved by the State Charter Schools Commission.
31 SECTION 2.
32 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Local Charter School Authorization and
33 Support Act of 2025."
34 SECTION 3.
35 Article 31 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the "Charter
36 Schools Act of 1998," is amended by revising Code Section 20-2-2064, relating to approval
37 or denial of petition, as follows:
38 "20-2-2064.
39 (a) A charter petitioner seeking to create a conversion charter school must shall submit a
40 petition to the local board of the local school system in which the proposed charter school
41 will be located. The local board must shall by a majority vote approve or deny a petition
H. B. 202
- 2 -

25 LC 49 2151
42 no later than 90 days after its submission unless the petitioner requests an extension;
43 provided, however, that a denial of a petition by a local board shall not preclude the
44 submission to the local board of a revised petition that addresses deficiencies cited in the
45 denial; and provided, further, that the local board shall not act upon a petition for a
46 conversion charter school, including, but not limited to, a conversion charter for a high
47 school cluster, until such petition:
48 (1)(A) Has been freely agreed to, by secret ballot, by a majority of the faculty and
49 instructional staff members of the petitioning local school at a public meeting called
50 with two weeks' advance notice for the purpose of deciding whether to submit the
51 petition to the local board for its approval; and
52 (B) Has been freely agreed to, by secret ballot, by a majority of the parents or
53 guardians of students enrolled in the petitioning local school present at a public meeting
54 called with two weeks' advance notice for the purpose of deciding whether to submit
55 the petition to the local board for its approval; or
56 (2) If for a high school cluster, has been approved by a majority of the school councils
57 in the high school cluster and has been freely agreed to, by secret ballot, by at least 60
58 percent of the combined vote of the faculty and instructional staff members of the high
59 school cluster and the parents or guardians of students who reside in the attendance zone
60 of such high school cluster present at a public meeting called with two weeks' advance
61 notice for the purpose of deciding whether to submit the petition to the local board for its
62 approval. Each school council within the high school cluster shall appoint two
63 representatives to a committee that shall conduct the vote.
64 The provisions of this This subsection shall not apply to a system charter school petitioning
65 to be a conversion charter school.
66 (b) A charter petitioner seeking to create a start-up charter school must shall submit a
67 petition to the local board of the local school system in which the proposed charter school
68 will be located. The local board must shall by a majority vote approve or deny a petition
H. B. 202
- 3 -

25 LC 49 2151
69 no later than 90 days after its submission unless the petitioner requests an extension. A
70 denial of a petition by a local board shall not preclude the submission to the local board of
71 a revised petition to the local board that addresses deficiencies cited in the denial.
72 (c) A system charter school's school council or governing council, as applicable, may
73 petition to become a conversion charter school. The petition shall be submitted to the local
74 board of the charter system in which the school is located. The local board must shall by
75 a majority vote approve or deny a petition no later than 90 days after its submission unless
76 the petitioner requests an extension; provided, however, that a denial of a petition by a local
77 board shall not preclude the submission to the local board of a revised petition to the local
78 board that addresses deficiencies cited in the denial.
79 (d)(1) A local board shall approve a petition that complies with the rules, regulations,
80 policies, and procedures promulgated in accordance with Code Section 20-2-2063 and
81 the provisions of this title and is in the public interest.
82 (2) If a local board denies a petition, it must shall within 60 ten days provide a written
83 statement of denial to the charter petitioner, the state board, and the Office of Charter
84 School Compliance specifically state stating the reasons for the denial, list and listing all
85 deficiencies with respect to Code Section 20-2-2063, detailing existing access to school
86 choice options for students in the local school system, and assessing the academic
87 performance of existing local schools in the area the charter school proposed to serve.
88 Within three days of such written statement being received by the Office of Charter
89 School Compliance, such written statement shall be published on the public website of
90 the Office of Charter School Compliance and provide a written statement of the denial
91 to the charter petitioner and the state board.
92 (3) If a local board denies a local charter school petition and the corresponding state
93 charter school petition is subsequently approved by the State Charter Schools
94 Commission as provided in Code Section 20-2-2084:
H. B. 202
- 4 -

25 LC 49 2151
95 (A) The Office of Charter School Compliance shall notify the local board of such
96 approval; and
97 (B) The state board and the Office of Charter School Compliance shall, upon review
98 of the local school system's written statement of denial provided for in paragraph (2)
99 of this subsection and the State Charter Schools Commission's rationale for approving
100 the charter petition, provide guidance to or recommend authorizer training for the local
101 school system, as appropriate.
102 (4)(A) Except as provided for in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, if the local board
103 of a local school system with enrollment of more than 10,000 students, based on such
104 local school system's full-time equivalent program count calculated as provided for in
105 subsection (b) of Code Section 20-2-160, denies two or more local charter school
106 petitions, and the corresponding state charter school petitions are subsequently
107 approved by the State Charter Schools Commission as provided in Code Section
108 20-2-2084 during the same term of such local school system's charter system contract
109 or strategic waivers school system contract, such local school system shall not be
110 eligible or authorized to renew its charter system status granted under Code Section
111 20-2-2063.2 or any strategic waivers granted under Article 4 of this chapter for up to
112 three years following the termination or expiration of its current charter system contract
113 or strategic waivers school systems contract, or until the state board determines the
114 local school system has demonstrated its commitment to increasing student
115 performance and encouraging innovation through high quality local charter petition
116 authorizations.
117 (B) The provisions of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall not apply to a local
118 school system with a charter system contract or strategic waivers school system
119 contract that, according to the terms of such contract in place on January 1, 2025, will
120 expire on or before July 1, 2025, until the term of such local school system's new or
121 renewed charter system contract or strategic waivers school system contract begins.
H. B. 202
- 5 -

25 LC 49 2151
122 (e) The state board or the Charter Advisory Committee, if directed by the state board to
123 do so, may mediate between the local board and a charter petitioner whose petition was
124 denied to assist in resolving issues which led to denial of the petition by the local board."
125 SECTION 4.
126 Said article is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
127 "20-2-2064.2.
128 (a) The State Charter Schools Commission shall establish a program for the purposes of
129 promoting and supporting the approval of new local charter school petitions by local boards
130 of education and to provide incentive grants to local boards of education that approve new
131 local charter school petitions. The State Charter Schools Commission shall promulgate
132 such rules and regulations as it deems necessary to carry out the provisions and intent of
133 this Code section.
134 (b)(1) Subject to appropriations, for each new local charter school petition approved by
135 a local board of education after June 30, 2025, such local board of education shall receive
136 an incentive grant of $100,000.00 by August 1 of each of the three years following such
137 approval, provided that such local charter school remains authorized by such local board
138 of education. In the event that available appropriations are not sufficient to cover the
139 total amount of such incentive grants provided for in this subsection, the amount of each
140 such grant shall be reduced proportionally, providing incentive grants in equal amounts
141 to each such local board of education.
142 (2) Incentive grants provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be provided
143 only for the approval of new local charter school petitions and not for the approval or
144 renewal of an existing local charter school.
145 (c) Incentive grants awarded pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section may be used
146 by the receiving local board of education for expenses incurred by the local board of
147 education in its role as a local charter school authorizer, which may include, but shall not
H. B. 202
- 6 -

25 LC 49 2151
148 be limited to, hiring qualified personnel and providing for oversight, compliance
149 monitoring, and professional development related to local charter school authorization.
150 (d) The Office of Charter School Compliance shall implement and administer the incentive
151 grant program provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section and shall provide
152 technical assistance necessary to local school systems in support of compliance with the
153 requirements of this Code section."
154 SECTION 5.
155 Said article is further amended in Code Section 20-2-2069, relating to the Office of Charter
156 School Compliance and the Office of District Flexibility, by revising subsection (a) as
157 follows:
158 "(a) There is established within the State Charter Schools Commission an Office of Charter
159 School Compliance, which shall be staffed with personnel as provided for in subsection
160 (d.1) of Code Section 20-2-2082, who shall report directly to the State Board of Education
161 for purposes of this subsection. The responsibilities of such office shall be to:
162 (1) Prepare charter school guidelines to be approved by the state board;
163 (2) Distribute charter school petition information to inquiring parties;
164 (3) Process all charter school petitions and coordinate with the Charter Advisory
165 Committee established pursuant to Code Section 20-2-2063.1 to facilitate its review and
166 recommendations to the state board;
167 (4) Administer any state or federal charter school implementation grant program;
168 (5) Contract with an independent party to evaluate the performance of charter schools,
169 as such performance relates to fulfilling the terms of their charters;
170 (6) Compile information necessary to produce the annual report required by Code
171 Section 20-2-2070, which shall include, but shall not be limited to, information regarding
172 the effectiveness of the incentives and the adherence of local school systems to the
173 requirements provided for in Code Sections 20-2-2064 and 20-2-2064.2; and
H. B. 202
- 7 -

25 LC 49 2151
174 (7) Prepare guidelines for local boards of education for the evaluation of charter school
175 petitions. Such guidelines shall be published on the public website of the Department of
176 Education and shall include:
177 (A) Criteria for evaluating the academic, operational, and financial plans of the charter
178 petitioner;
179 (B) Best practices for conducting a thorough and objective review of charter petitions;
180 (C) Procedures for public hearings and community input on charter petitions; and
181 (D) A standardized evaluation rubric for use by local boards of education during the
182 evaluation of charter petitions; and
183 (8) Provide technical assistance to Assist local school systems as charter school
184 authorizers as challenges arise, support local school systems as needed to implement best
185 practices in charter school authorization, and regularly engage with local school systems
186 to promote charter school authorization at the local level."
187 SECTION 6.
188 Said article is further amended by revising Code Section 20-2-2070, relating to annual report
189 to General Assembly, as follows:
190 "20-2-2070.
191 No The state board shall report to the General Assembly no later than December 31 of each
192 year, the state board shall submit a report on the status of the charter school program to the
193 Speaker of the House of Representatives; the President of the Senate; the chairpersons of
194 the House Committee on Education, the Senate Education and Youth Committee, the
195 House Committee on Appropriations, and the Senate Appropriations Committee; and the
196 Office of Planning and Budget."
H. B. 202
- 8 -

25 LC 49 2151
197 SECTION 7.
198 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
199 without such approval.
200 SECTION 8.
201 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 202
- 9 -